Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202668-2107
Hospital inpatient and outpatient services; medicaid rates; legislative intent.

It is the intent of the Legislature that medicaid rates paid for hospital inpatient and outpatient services and the General Fund appropriations for hospital inpatient and outpatient services in the medical assistance program shall not be reduced to an amount below the rates paid and General Fund appropriations for these services in fiscal year 2023-24.

Laws 2024, LB1087, § 7.